North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-17.1 Emergency Services
37-17.1-19.
Temporary housing for disaster victims and site acquisition and preparation.

The governor is authorized to enter into such agreements and execute such assurances on behalf of the state of North Dakota as may be necessary to establish, in the event of a disaster or emergency, a program of temporary housing for disaster victims adversely affected by a disaster or emergency. The governor is authorized:

To receive temporary housing units to be occupied by disaster or emergency victims from any agency of the United States and to make such units available to any county or city of the state.

To assist any county or city of this state which is the site of temporary housing for disaster or emergency victims, to acquire and to prepare sites necessary for such temporary housing, and to “pass through” funds made available by any agency, public or private.

Any county or city of this state is expressly authorized to acquire, temporarily or permanently, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, sites required for installation of temporary housing units for disaster or emergency victims and to enter into whatever arrangements, including purchase of temporary housing units and payment of transportation charges, which are necessary to prepare or equip such sites to utilize the housing units.

The governor shall establish guidelines necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 37-17.1-19, 37-17.1-20, and 37-17.1-21.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 311, § 1; 1985, ch. 398, § 18; 2007, ch. 308, § 11.

37-17.1-20.
Community disaster loans.

The governor is authorized to enter into such agreements and execute such assurances on behalf of the state of North Dakota as may be necessary to establish, in the event of a presidentially declared “major disaster”, a program of community disaster loans in those cases when communities are unable to meet or provide for their essential governmental functions. Upon the governor’s determination that a local government of the state will suffer a substantial loss of tax and other revenues from a disaster and has demonstrated a need for financial assistance to perform its governmental functions, the governor may apply to the federal government, on behalf of the local government, for a loan and receive and disburse the proceeds of any approved loan to any applicant local government.

The governor may:

Determine the amount needed by any applicant local government to restore or resume its governmental functions and certify the same to the federal government. No application amount may exceed twenty-five percent of the annual operating budget of the applicant for the fiscal year in which the disaster occurs.

Recommend to the federal government, based upon the governor’s review, the cancellation of all or any part of repayment when, within three fiscal years following the disaster, the revenues of the local government are insufficient to meet its operating expenses, including additional disaster-related expenses of a county or city.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 311, § 2; 1985, ch. 398, § 19; 1987, ch. 73, § 19; 2007, ch. 308, § 12.

37-17.1-21.
Debris and wreckage removal in disasters or emergencies.

The governor is authorized to enter into such agreements and execute such assurances on behalf of the state of North Dakota as may be necessary to establish, in the event of a disaster or emergency, a program of debris and wreckage removal caused by a disaster. The governor is authorized:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, through the use of state departments or agencies, or the use of any of the state’s instrumentalities, to clear or remove from publicly or privately owned land or water, debris and wreckage which may threaten public health or safety, or threaten public or private property, in any disaster or emergency declared by the governor.

To accept funds from the federal government and utilize such funds to make grants to any local government for the purpose of removing debris or wreckage from publicly or privately owned land or water.

Authority under sections 37-17.1-19, 37-17.1-20, and 37-17.1-21 may not be exercised, except upon state-owned lands, unless the affected local government, corporation, limited liability company, organization, or individual first presents an unconditional authorization for removal of such debris or wreckage from public and private property and, in the case of removal of debris or wreckage from private property, first agrees to indemnify the state government against any claim arising from such removal.

Whenever the governor provides for clearance of debris or wreckage pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, employees of the designated state agencies or individuals appointed by the state are authorized to enter upon private land or waters and perform any tasks necessary to the removal or clearance operation.

Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any state employee or agent complying with orders of the governor and performing duties pursuant thereto under sections 37-17.1-19, 37-17.1-20, and 37-17.1-21 is not liable for death of or injury to persons or damage to property.

The governor shall establish guidelines to carry out the purposes of sections 37-17.1-19, 37-17.1-20, and 37-17.1-21.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 311, § 3; 1985, ch. 398, § 20; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2007, ch. 308, § 13.

37-17.1-22.
Disaster or emergency response and recovery costs.

Whenever the governor declares a state of disaster or emergency in accordance with section 37-17.1-05, or when the governor enters into an agreement with the federal government following a disaster or emergency declared by the president of the United States, the director of the division of homeland security shall determine and record the costs of the state response and recovery operations in accordance with an agreement with the federal government or in accordance with procedures established by the governor in the case of a state-declared disaster or emergency. Immediately following the response or recovery operations, or prior thereto if determined necessary by the governor, the governor may apply to the state emergency commission for a grant of funds in an amount equal to the response and recovery costs of the state. Notwithstanding other provisions of chapter 54-16, it must be conclusively presumed upon receipt by the emergency commission of the application from the governor that a disaster or emergency exists, and the commission may grant and direct the transfer to the department of the governor designated representative of an amount up to that certified in the application by the governor.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 394, § 1; 1985, ch. 398, § 21; 2005, ch. 16, § 23; 2015, ch. 251, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 102, § 2, effective February 23, 2017; 2019, ch. 292, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 provides, “

EXPIRATION DATE

. This Act is effective through June 30, 2017, and after that date is ineffective.”

37-17.1-23.
Disaster or emergency recovery funding — Loan authorization.

When approved by the emergency commission, the office of the adjutant general is authorized to borrow from the Bank of North Dakota, to match federal funds under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Emergency Assistance Act [Public Law 93-288, as amended]. In addition to the principal repayment, the Bank of North Dakota shall receive interest on the loan at a rate equal to other state agency borrowings. On behalf of the state, the office of the adjutant general shall administer the disaster or emergency recovery program according to state procedures based on federal laws or regulations. After a county or group of counties have been declared a major disaster or emergency area by the president, the office of the adjutant general shall submit a request to the emergency commission for:

Approval to make an application for a loan from the Bank of North Dakota;

Approval for additional personnel required to perform the anticipated recovery activities; and

Authority to spend additional state and federal funds for the recovery program.

If the request is acceptable, the emergency commission shall approve the request and issue a notice of its action to the office of the adjutant general, Bank of North Dakota, and the office of management and budget. The office of the adjutant general shall keep the emergency commission apprised of the progress of the recovery operation and submit a final report upon completion of the project. The office of the adjutant general is responsible to repay any loan, including accrued interest, from the Bank of North Dakota which is provided under this section. If at the end of the biennium a balance exists on the loan, the office of the adjutant general shall request the legislative assembly for a deficiency appropriation to repay the loan.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 380, § 1; 1999, ch. 326, § 1; 2005, ch. 16, § 24; 2011, ch. 260, § 1; 2015, ch. 251, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 provides, “

EXPIRATION DATE

. This Act is effective through June 30, 2017, and after that date is ineffective.”

The Robert T. Stafford Disaster Emergency Assistance Act [Public Law 93-288, as amended] referenced above is found generally as 42 USCS §§ 5121, et seq.

37-17.1-24.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 308, § 2.

37-17.1-25.
Intrastate mutual aid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 308, § 2.

37-17.1-26.
Intrastate mutual aid agreements.

The department of emergency services shall prepare and distribute to political subdivisions guidelines and model intrastate mutual aid agreements to provide a system for mutual assistance among political subdivisions in the prevention of, response to, and recovery from a local disaster or emergency. To access state funds for disaster response and recovery during a nonfederally declared disaster, counties and cities shall participate in intrastate mutual aid and shall take all necessary steps to ensure eligibility for federal funds.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 308, § 1.

37-17.1-27.
State disaster relief fund — Creation — Uses.

There is created in the state treasury a state disaster relief fund. Moneys in the fund are to be used subject to legislative appropriations for providing the required state share of funding for expenses and administration associated with federal emergency management agency disaster response, recovery, and mitigation grants and for the purposes of reimbursing costs under section 37-17.1-28. Any interest or other fund earnings must be deposited in the fund. Before any expenditure is made from the fund, the agency authorized to make the expenditure shall provide information on the purpose and payee of the expenditure to the appropriation committees of the house of representatives and senate or to the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 40, § 4; 2011, ch. 261, § 1; 2013, ch. 267, § 3; 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 438, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 267, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 251, S.L. 2015 provides, “

EXPIRATION DATE

. This Act is effective through June 30, 2017, and after that date is ineffective.”

37-17.1-28.
Wide area search and rescue activities — Powers and duties of local officials — Costs.

The chief law enforcement officer of each political subdivision is responsible for local wide area search and rescue activities. The operation of a wide area search and rescue activity must be in accordance with state and local operations plans adopted by the governing body of each subdivision. A state or local operations plan must specify the use of the incident command system for a multiagency or multijurisdictional search and rescue operation. The local emergency management director shall notify the department of emergency services of each wide area search and rescue mission. The local emergency management director shall work in a coordinating capacity directly supporting all wide area search and rescue activities in that political subdivision and in registering each emergency search and rescue worker for employee status. The chief law enforcement official of each political subdivision may restrict access to a specific search and rescue area to personnel authorized by the chief law enforcement official. Access may be restricted only for the time necessary to accomplish the search and rescue mission. An unauthorized person may not interfere with a search and rescue mission.

If a search and rescue activity results in the discovery of a deceased individual or if any search and rescue worker assists in the recovery of human remains, the chief law enforcement official of the political subdivision shall ensure compliance with chapter 11-19.1.

Upon authorization by the governor and approval of costs by the director of the division of homeland security, expenses incurred in meeting a contingency or emergency arising from a wide area search and rescue operation may be reimbursed under section 37-17.1-22 or 37-17.1-27.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 267, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-29.
Firearms in emergencies.

Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency, political subdivision, or elected or appointed official or employee of this state or of a political subdivision may not, under governmental authority or color of law, including any other statutorily authorized responses to disaster, war, acts of terrorism, or emergencies of whatever kind or nature:

Close or limit the operating hours of:

Any government-owned or government-operated indoor or outdoor shooting range, unless the closure or limitation is required for maintenance, law enforcement training, military training, hunter education, or other special activities associated with the shooting sports or the closing or limitation of hours applies equally to all forms of commerce, use, recreation, enjoyment, or general activity within the jurisdiction;

Any private indoor or outdoor shooting range, unless the closing or limitation of hours applies equally to all forms of commerce, use, recreation, enjoyment, or general activities within the jurisdiction; or

Any entity engaged in the lawful selling or servicing of any firearm, including any component or accessory; ammunition, including any component or accessory; ammunition-reloading equipment and supplies; or personal weapons other than firearms, unless the closing or limitation of hours applies equally to all forms of commerce, use, recreation, enjoyment, or general activity within the jurisdiction;

Prohibit, regulate, or curtail the otherwise lawful possession, defensive use, carrying, transfer, transportation, storage, display, or other lawful use of; or seize, commandeer, confiscate, or authorize the seizure or confiscation of, any otherwise lawfully possessed firearm or ammunition unless the person acting on behalf of or under the authority of the state or political subdivision is defending that person or another from an assault, arresting an individual in actual possession of a firearm or ammunition for a violation of law, or seizing or confiscating the firearm or ammunition as evidence of a crime;

When registration is not otherwise required by law, require registration of any firearm, including any component or accessory; ammunition, including any component or accessory; ammunition-reloading equipment and supplies; or personal weapons other than firearms;

Suspend or revoke a permit to carry a concealed pistol issued pursuant to chapter 62.1-04, except as expressly authorized in that chapter; or

Refuse to accept an application for a permit to carry a concealed pistol, provided the application has been completed properly in accordance with chapter 62.1-04.

Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section may commence a civil action against any person who subjects the individual, or causes the individual to be subjected, to an action prohibited by this section.

In addition to any other remedy, an individual aggrieved by the seizure or confiscation of a firearm or ammunition in violation of this section may bring an action for the return of the firearm or ammunition, or the value of the firearm or ammunition, if the firearm or ammunition is no longer available, in the district court of the county in which that individual resides, in which the firearm or ammunition is located, or in which the seizure or confiscation occurred.

In any action to enforce this section, the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 272, § 1; 2021, ch. 273, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

Cross-References.

Concealed weapons, see N.D.C.C. ch. 62.1-04.

Handguns, see N.D.C.C. ch. 62.1-03.

Possession of weapons, see N.D.C.C. ch. 62.1-02.